Washington statutes.
RCW 8.26.200

Expenses incidental to transfer of right, title, or interest to the acquiring agency.

As soon as practicable after the date of payment of the purchase price or the date of deposit in court of funds to satisfy the award of compensation in a condemnation proceeding to acquire real property, whichever is the earlier, the acquiring agency shall reimburse the owner, to the extent the acquiring agency deems fair and reasonable, for expenses the owner necessarily incurred for:

(1) Recording fees, transfer taxes, and similar expenses incidental to conveying such real property to the acquiring agency;

(2) Penalty costs for full or partial prepayment of any preexisting recorded mortgage entered into in good faith encumbering such real property; and

(3) The pro rata portion of real property taxes paid which are allocable to a period subsequent to the date of vesting title in the acquiring agency, or the effective date of possession of such real property by the acquiring agency, whichever is the earlier.

[ 1988 c 90 s 14; 1971 ex.s. c 240 s 20.]

NOTES:

Section captions—1988 c 90: See note following RCW 8.26.010.